Connecticut, session 2026, HB05415.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) (a) There is established an
Office of the Veterans' and Military Healthcare Ombudsman, which
shall be within the Office of the Healthcare Advocate for administrative
purposes only, to (1) coordinate with various resources, including, but
not limited to, veterans' service officers and municipal veterans
representatives, in assisting veterans who are eligible to receive health
care through the United States Department of Veterans Affairs, and
caregivers of such veterans, with navigating the health care system
administered by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs, (2)
coordinate with various resources in assisting active and retired
members of the armed forces and National Guard and the families of
such members who are eligible to receive health care through the United
States Department of Defense, and caregivers of such members and
families, with navigating the health care system administered by the
United States Department of Defense, and (3) advocate for increased
coordination among such various resources when deficiencies in such
coordination are identified. The Governor shall appoint a Veterans' and
Military Healthcare Ombudsman, who shall be selected from among
LCO 1 of 4

Substitute Bill No. 5415
individuals with expertise and experience in a field concerning the
health care of veterans, members of the armed forces and their families,
to head the office.
(b) The Office of the Veterans' and Military Healthcare Ombudsman
shall:
(1) Receive, review and attempt to resolve any complaints from
eligible persons and caregivers described in subsection (a) of this section
regarding obstacles to applying for or receiving health care through the
United States Department of Veterans Affairs or the United States
Department of Defense, including, but not limited to, difficulties in
accessing assistance from existing state and municipal resources;
(2) Compile and analyze data on complaints described in subdivision
(1) of this subsection;
(3) Assist such eligible persons and caregivers in understanding their
rights and responsibilities in relation to the health care system
administered by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs or the
United States Department of Defense, as applicable;
(4) Provide information to the public, agencies, legislators and others
regarding the problems and concerns of such eligible persons and
caregivers and make recommendations for resolving those problems
and concerns;
(5) Analyze and monitor the development and implementation of
federal laws, regulations and policies relating to the health care systems
administered by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs and
the United States Department of Defense and recommend any changes
the Veterans' and Military Healthcare Ombudsman deems necessary;
(6) Disseminate information concerning the availability of the Office
of the Veterans' and Military Healthcare Ombudsman to assist such
persons and caregivers with any health care concerns relevant to such
persons or caregivers; and
LCO 2 of 4

Substitute Bill No. 5415
(7) Take any other actions necessary to fulfill the duties of the Office
of the Veterans' and Military Healthcare Ombudsman and the Veterans'
and Military Healthcare Ombudsman as set forth in this subsection.
(c) On or before October 1, 2027, the Veterans' and Military
Healthcare Ombudsman, in consultation with the Commissioner of
Veterans Affairs and the Adjutant General, shall, within available
appropriations, establish and maintain a veterans' and military health
care education course that shall include educational presentations and
materials regarding the health care systems administered by the United
States Department of Veterans Affairs and the United States
Department of Defense and state and local resources available to eligible
persons and caregivers described in subsection (a) of this section in
navigating such systems.
(d) On or before January 1, 2028, and annually thereafter, the
Veterans' and Military Healthcare Ombudsman shall submit a report, in
accordance with the provisions of section 11-4a of the general statutes,
to the joint standing committee of the General Assembly having
cognizance of matters relating to veterans' and military affairs, on (1) the
implementation of this section, and (2) recommendations for legislation
to improve such implementation.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 New section
Statement of Legislative Commissioners:
Throughout the section, references to "Veterans' Healthcare
Ombudsman" were changed to "Veterans' and Military Healthcare
Ombudsman", for consistency with other provisions of the section; in
the last sentence of Subsec. (a), "veterans' health care" was changed to
"the health care of veterans, members of the armed forces and their
families,", for consistency and clarity; in Subsec. (b)(3), "as applicable"
was added, for clarity; in Subsec. (b)(5), "system" was changed to
"systems" and "Affairs or" was changed to "Affairs and", for accuracy;
LCO 3 of 4

Substitute Bill No. 5415
and in Subsec. (c), "military personnel health" was changed to "military
health", for consistency, and ", respectively," was deleted, for clarity.
VA Joint Favorable Subst.
LCO 4 of 4